District of Columbia statutes.
1-620.08

Records.

Each agency shall keep adequate records of all occupational accidents and illnesses occurring within the agency for proper evaluation and necessary corrective action and make statistical or other reports as the Mayor may require by rules and regulations.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2008, 25 DCR 5740
1981 Ed., § 1-621.8.
1973 Ed., § 1-350.8.
For temporary addition of § 1-621.11 1981 Ed., see § 2 of the Testing of District Government Drivers of Commercial Motor Vehicles for Alcohol and Controlled Substances Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-294, February 27, 1998, 45 DCR 1762).
Testing of District Government Drivers of Commercial Motor Vehicles for Alcohol and Controlled Substances: See Mayor’s Order 96-139, September 17, 1996 ( 43 DCR 5287).